Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 18 Trust Directors

53-12-500.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Directed trustee” means a trustee that is subject to a trust director’s power of direction.

“Power of appointment” means a power that enables a person, acting in a nonfiduciary capacity, to:

Designate a recipient of either an ownership interest in or another power of appointment over trust property;

Rescind or terminate either an ownership interest in or another power of appointment over trust property; and

Determine when a beneficiary shall have the rights granted under Code Sections 53-12-242 and 53-12-243 or similar rights granted under the governing instrument.

“Power of direction” means a power over a trust granted to a person by the trust instrument to the extent the power is exercisable in a capacity other than as a trustee. Such term includes a power over the administration of the trust or the investment, management, or distribution of the trust property; a power to consent to a trustee’s actions, whether through exercise of an affirmative power to consent or through nonexercise of a veto power over a trustee’s actions, where a trustee may not act without such consent; and all further powers appropriate to the exercise or nonexercise of such powers held by the trust director pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 53-12-502. Such term shall exclude the powers described in subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-501.

“Trust director” means a person that is granted a power of direction by a trust to the extent the power is exercisable in a capacity other than as a trustee, regardless of whether the trust instrument refers to such person as a trust director and regardless of whether the person is a beneficiary or settlor of the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-500

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 25/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-87/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in paragraph (2), substituted “: (A) Designate” for “designate”, added a semicolon at the end of present subparagraph (2)(A), and added subparagraphs (2)(B) and (2)(C); in paragraph (3), substituted “in a capacity other than” for “while the person is not serving” in the first sentence and in the second sentence, substituted “where” for “when”, substituted “and all” for “a power to represent a beneficiary, other than a power under Code Section 53-12-8; and, except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, any”, and added “held by the trust director pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 53-12-502”; and, in paragraph (4), substituted “in a capacity other than” for “while the person is not serving”, substituted “whether” for “how”, and inserted “as a trust director”.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 enactment of this article, see
35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

53-12-501.
Application of article; construction of trust instrument.

This article shall apply when the trust instrument evidences the settlor’s intent to provide for the office and function of a trust director, regardless of the terms used to describe such office and functions.

This article shall not apply to:

A power of appointment;

A power to appoint or remove a trustee or trust director;

A power of a settlor to revoke the trust or amend the trust instrument;

A power of a beneficiary over a trust to the extent the exercise or nonexercise of the power affects the beneficial interest of the beneficiary or a person represented by the beneficiary under Code Section 53-12-8 with respect to the exercise or nonexercise of the power; or

A power over a trust if both:

The trust instrument provides such power is held in a nonfiduciary capacity; and

Such power is held in a nonfiduciary capacity to achieve the settlor’s tax objectives.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, for purposes of this Code section a power granted to a person to designate a recipient of an ownership interest in or power over trust property that is exercisable in a capacity other than as a trustee is a power of appointment and not a power of direction.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-501

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 25/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-88/HB 865; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 53/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in paragraph (b)(5), inserted “both” and substituted “trust instrument provides” for “terms of the trust provide” and, in subsection (c), substituted “granted to a person to designate a recipient of an ownership interest in or power over trust property that is exercisable in a capacity other than as a trustee is” for “that is both a power of appointment and a power of direction shall be deemed”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “power is held” for “power must be held” in subparagraph (b)(5)(B).

53-12-502.
Authority, procedures, and powers of trust directors.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a trust instrument may grant powers of direction to a trust director.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, when a trust instrument grants powers of direction to a trust director, the trust director shall have any further powers appropriate to the exercise or nonexercise of the powers of direction.

A trust director shall have the same power to employ and compensate persons, subject to the same limitations, that a trustee has under paragraph (23) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-261.

The powers of direction of a trust director who is also a beneficiary shall be subject to the limitations of Code Section 53-12-270.

In the case of a power to modify the trust:

The duties or liabilities of a trustee may not be enlarged without the trustee’s express consent; and

A trustee shall not be liable for failing to act in accordance with a modification or termination of a trust of which the trustee had no notice.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-502

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 25/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-89/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “Except as otherwise provided in” for “Subject to” at the beginning of subsection (a); substituted “Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, when a trust instrument grants powers of direction to a trust director, the trust director shall have any further powers appropriate to the exercise or nonexercise of the powers of direction.” for “A trust director shall be subject to the same rules as a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances in the exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction regarding: (1) A payback provision in the trust necessary to comply with the reimbursement requirements of Medicaid law in Section 1917 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1396p(d)(4)(A), as it existed on February 1, 2018, and regulations issued thereunder; and (2) A charitable interest in the trust.” in subsection (b); added subsection (c) and redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as subsections (d) and (e).

53-12-503.
Role of directors; petitioning court for instructions.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, with respect to a power of direction, a trust director shall have the same fiduciary duty and liability in the exercise or nonexercise of the power of direction as a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

Where a trust director individually holds a power of direction, the trust director shall not have the liability of a cotrustee, whether under Code Section 53-12-305 or otherwise, with respect to a trustee or other trust director. Where a trust director holds a power of direction jointly with a trustee or other trust director, the trust director shall have the liability of a cotrustee, whether under Code Section 53-12-305 or otherwise, with respect to a trustee or other trust director regarding the actions of that trustee or other trust director that are within the scope of the jointly held power.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, a trust director shall not have the duties imposed by Code Section 53-12-242 and subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-243.

Without limiting the scope of subsection (a) of this Code section:

The trust instrument may vary a trust director’s duty or liability to the same extent the trust instrument could vary the duty or liability of a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances;

An action against a trust director for breach of trust must be commenced within the same limitation period as under Code Section 53-12-307 for an action for breach of trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances; and

A report or accounting shall have the same effect on the limitation period for an action against a trust director for breach of trust that the report or accounting would have under Code Section 53-12-307 in an action for breach of trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

A trust instrument may make the existence of a trust director’s power of direction contingent upon the occurrence of certain events, including a request to the trust director from a beneficiary or other similar party. A trust instrument may also provide that a trust director’s power of direction terminates or is rescinded upon the occurrence of certain events, including but not limited to the passage of a specified period of time after a request. For purposes of Code Section 53-12-501, when a power of direction is contingent upon a request to a trust director from a person identified in the trust instrument, such person shall be deemed to hold a power of appointment.

A trust instrument may empower a trust director to delegate a power of direction to a trustee and provide that, upon written acceptance of such delegation by the trustee, the trustee shall assume the fiduciary duties and liabilities conferred by the power of direction until such time as the trust director or trustee terminates the delegation by written notice. Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, during the time a power of direction is delegated in accordance with this subsection, the trust director making such delegation shall not be subject to a fiduciary obligation to monitor the trustee’s exercise or nonexercise of the delegated power.

Subject to subsection (j) of this Code section, a trust director shall:

Keep trustees and other trust directors reasonably informed of the exercise or nonexercise of the trust director’s power of direction to the extent such exercise or nonexercise is relevant to the party’s powers and duties regarding the trust; and

Respond to reasonable requests from trustees and other trust directors for information to the extent such information is relevant to the party’s powers and duties regarding the trust.

A trust director acting in reliance on information provided by a trustee or another trust director shall not be liable for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from such reliance, unless the trust director acts in bad faith.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, if a trust director is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law other than this article to provide health care in the ordinary course of the trust director’s business or practice of a profession, to the extent the trust director acts in such capacity, the trust director shall have no duty or liability under this article.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, a trust director shall not have a duty to:

Monitor a trustee or another trust director regarding matters outside the scope of the trust director’s powers of direction; or

Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or another trust director concerning an instance in which the director might have acted differently from a trustee or another trust director.

By taking one of the actions described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, a trust director does not assume any of the duties excluded by this subsection.

A trust instrument may impose a duty or liability on a trust director in addition to the duties and liabilities under this Code section.

A trust director that has reasonable doubt about a duty imposed by this Code section may petition the court for instructions.

A trust director shall be subject to the same rules as a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances in the exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction regarding:

A payback provision in the trust necessary to comply with the reimbursement requirements of Medicaid law in Section 1917 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1396p(d)(4)(A), as amended, and regulations issued thereunder; and

A charitable interest in the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-503

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 25/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-90/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “article” for “Code section”, substituted “, a” for “: (1) A”, deleted “; and”, and deleted paragraph (a)(2) which read: “The trust instrument may vary the trust director’s duty or liability to the same extent the trust instrument could vary the duty or liability of a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances”; added subsections (b), (c), and (d) and redesignated former subsections (b) through (i) as present subsections (e) through (l); in subsection (e), deleted “, but not limited to,” following “included” and added the last two sentences; added the last sentence in subsection (f); substituted “subsection (j)” for “subsection (g)” in subsection (g); substituted “the trust director acts in bad faith” for “by so acting the trust director engages in willful misconduct” in subsection (h); substituted “does” for “shall” in paragraph (j)(2); and added subsection (m).

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-504.
Directed trustees; role; trustee’s duty as to directed trustee; petitioning court for instructions.

Unless compliance by the directed trustee would clearly constitute an act committed in bad faith on the part of the directed trustee, a directed trustee shall take reasonable action to comply with a trust director’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction and shall not be liable for such action. A directed trustee must not comply with a trust director’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction to the extent that compliance by the directed trustee would clearly constitute an act committed in bad faith.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this Code section, a direction from a trust director shall be within the scope of the trust director’s powers of direction if the directed trustee believes in good faith that the direction is within the trust director’s powers of direction.

Subject to subsection (f) of this Code section, a directed trustee shall:

Except as provided otherwise in the trust instrument, provide information to a trust director as if the trust director were a beneficiary of an irrevocable trust to whom income is required or authorized in the trustee’s discretion to be distributed; and

Respond to reasonable requests from a trust director for information to the extent such information is relevant to the trust director’s powers and duties regarding the trust.

A directed trustee acting in reliance on information provided by a trust director shall not be liable for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from such reliance, unless by so acting the directed trustee acts in bad faith.

A trustee shall not be liable for a failure to sufficiently report or provide information to a beneficiary or other party when such failure is related to the failure of a trust director to provide information to the trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, a trustee shall not have a duty to:

Monitor, investigate, review, or evaluate a trust director, including a trust director’s actions or inactions;

Provide any accountings, reports, or other information to a trust director beyond that required by subsection (c) of this Code section;

Advise a trust director regarding the scope, nature, execution, standard of care, potential liability, or other aspects of their status as trust director;

If compliance with a direction from the trust director would constitute an act committed in bad faith, take any action in response to such direction other than the refusal to comply with such direction;

Attempt to compel a trust director to act or not act;

Petition the court regarding a trust director’s action, inaction, capacity, or any similar matter; or

Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or trust director concerning an instance in which the trustee might have acted differently from the trust director.

By taking one of the actions described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, a directed trustee does not assume any of the duties excluded by this subsection.

An exercise of a power of direction under which a trust director may release a trustee from liability for breach of trust shall not be effective if the release was induced in bad faith or by the provision of false or incomplete information by the trustee.

A trust instrument may impose a duty or liability on a directed trustee in addition to the duties and liabilities under this Code section.

A directed trustee that has reasonable doubt about a duty imposed by this Code section may petition the court for instructions.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-504

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 25/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-91/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “an act committed in bad faith” for “willful misconduct” and added the last sentence; in subsection (b), substituted “For purposes of subsection (a)” for “Subject to subsection (e)”, substituted “direction from a trust director shall be within the scope of the trust director’s powers of direction if the directed trustee believes in good faith that the direction is within the trust director’s powers of direction” for “shall: (1) Account at least annually to a trust director as if the trust director were a qualified beneficiary of an irrevocable trust to whom income is required or authorized in the trustee’s discretion to be distributed; and (2) Respond to reasonable requests from a trust director for information to the extent such information is relevant to the party’s interest in or trust director’s powers and duties regarding the trust”; added subsections (c) and (h) and redesignated former subsections (c) through (g) as subsections (d) through (g) and (i); substituted “acts in bad faith” for “engages in willful misconduct” in subsection (d); in subsection (f), substituted “subsection (c) of this Code section” for “subsection (b) of this Code Section” in subparagraph (f)(1)(B), substituted “If compliance with a direction from the trust director would constitute an act committed in bad faith, take any action in response to such direction” for “Take any action in response to willful misconduct by the trust director” in subparagraph (f)(1)(D), substituted “from” for “than” in subparagraph (f)(1)(G), and substituted “this subsection” for “this Code section” in paragraph (f)(2); and substituted “in bad faith or by” for “by willful misconduct or” in subsection (g).

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-505.
Relief from duty and liability.

A trust instrument may relieve a cotrustee from duty and liability with respect to another cotrustee’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of the other cotrustee to the same extent that a directed trustee is relieved from duty and liability with respect to a trust director’s power of direction under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-505

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 25/HB 121.

53-12-506.
Statutory provisions applicable to trust directors; defenses available to trust directors; personal jurisdiction; term “trustee” includes trust director where required or permitted.

An individual shall be eligible to serve as a trust director regardless of citizenship and residency. If the trust director is a corporation, partnership, or other entity, it shall be required to have the power to act as a trustee in Georgia.

The rules applicable to a trustee apply to a trust director regarding:

Jurisdiction under Code Section 53-12-6;

Appointment and acceptance, compensation, and resignation and removal of trustees under Article 11 of this chapter;

Accounting under Article 12 of this chapter; and

Nonresidents and foreign entities acting as trustees under Article 15 of this chapter.

In an action against a trust director for breach of trust, the trust director may assert the same defenses a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances could assert in an action for breach of trust against the trustee.

By accepting appointment as a trust director of a trust subject to this article, a trust director submits to personal jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter related to a power or duty of a trust director. This subsection shall not preclude use of another method to obtain jurisdiction over a trust director.

As used in this Code, where the context requires or permits, the term “trustee” includes a trust director.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-506

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 25/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-92/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added subsections (a) and (e) and redesignated former subsections (a) through (c) as present subsections (b) through (d); in subsection (b), in the introductory language, substituted “The” for “Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, the” and deleted “shall” following “trustee”, rewrote paragraph (b)(1), which formerly read: “Appointment and vacancies under Code Section 53-12-201”, rewrote paragraph (b)(2), which formerly read: “Acceptance under Code Section 53-12-202”, rewrote paragraph (b)(3), which formerly read: “Giving of a bond under Code Section 53-12-203”, rewrote paragraph (b)(4), which formerly read: “Co-trustees under Code Section 53-12-204”, and deleted former paragraphs (b)(5) through (b)(8), which formerly read: “(5) Compensation and reimbursement of expenses under Code Sections 53-12-210 through 53-12-214; (6) Resignation under Code Section 53-12-220; (7) Removal under Code Section 53-12-221; and (8) Service under Code Section 53-12-320”.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).